Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.130

Election to discontinue mall—Ordinance—Outstanding obligations—Restoration to former status.

The board of directors of a mall organization may call for an election, after the mall has been in operation for two years, at which the voting shall be by secret ballot, on the question: "Shall the mall be continued in operation?" If sixty percent of the membership of the organization vote to discontinue the mall, the results of the election shall be submitted to the corporate authority. The corporate authority may initiate proceedings by ordinance for the discontinuation of the mall, allocate the proportionate amount of the outstanding obligations of the mall to the abutting property of the mall or property specially benefited if a local improvement district is established, subject to the provisions of any applicable statutes and bond ordinances, resolutions, or agreements, and thereafter, at a time set by the corporate authority, the mall may be restored to its former right-of-way status.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.71.130. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 13.]